Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2461.01
Central fill, defined; central fill pharmacy; delivery authorized.

(1) Central fill means the preparation, other than by compounding, of a drug, device, or biological pursuant to a medical order where the preparation occurs in a pharmacy other than the pharmacy dispensing to the patient or caregiver as defined in section 38-2809.

(2) If the dispensing pharmacy and central fill pharmacy are under common ownership, the central fill pharmacy may deliver such drug, device, or biological to the patient or caregiver on behalf of the dispensing pharmacy, except that the dispensing pharmacy shall be responsible for the prescriptions filled and delivered by the central fill pharmacy.

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 14;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 77.